Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Practices.

Sec. 08.26.100.
Court appointment.

An individual who engages in the business of providing services as a guardian or conservator may not be appointed as a guardian or a conservator in a court proceeding unless the individual is licensed under this chapter or exempt under AS

08.26.010

or AS

08.26.180

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 9 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32(a), ch. 84, SLA 2004, provides that this section “has the effect of changing Rule 17(c), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, by restricting the persons that the court may appoint as guardians or conservators in some situations and, therefore, has the effect of limiting the orders that the court is authorized to make under Rule 17(c) with regard to the protection of infants or incompetent persons.”

Sec. 08.26.110.
Fees.

A licensee may not receive a payment for services rendered to a ward or a protected person until the licensee obtains court approval of a proposed fee schedule. The fee schedule must include a statement of the hourly fee for professional and administrative services and a monthly maximum amount that the licensee can charge the ward or protected person.

A payment requested by a licensee that exceeds the established monthly maximum amount identified under (a) of this section may not be made unless the payment is approved by the court. A request for court approval of a fee that exceeds the established monthly maximum amount must include the following information for the services covered by the fee:

the name of the person who provided the service;

the date when the service was provided;

the hourly rate of compensation for the service;

a description of the service; and

the amount of time used to perform the service.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Sec. 08.26.120.
Required notification.

A licensee shall notify the department immediately if

the licensee fails to file a report to the court required by this chapter;

the licensee has been removed as a guardian or conservator for a ward or protected person;

the licensee has received a gift with a value of more than $100 from a ward or protected person during the two years before the appointment;

the licensee has an interest in an enterprise that provides services to the ward or protected person;

an employee or contractor of the licensee is arrested for any offense; or

the licensee has filed for bankruptcy.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004)